District of Columbia statutes.
46-302.09

Credit for payments.

A tribunal of the District shall credit amounts collected for a particular period pursuant to any child-support order against the amounts owed for the same period under any other child-support order for support of the same child issued by a tribunal of the District or another state.

History

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 209, 42 DCR 6748
June 22, 2006, D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(b)(3)(D), 53 DCR 3634

Section References

This section is referenced in § 46-302.07.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 30-342.9.
D.C. Law 16-137 rewrote section, which had read as follows: “Amounts collected and credited for a particular period pursuant to a support order issued by a tribunal of another state must be credited against the amounts accruing or accrued for the same period under a support order issued by the tribunal of the District.”

Effective Dates

Applicability: Section 3 of D.C. Law 16-137 provided: “This act shall apply as of April 1, 2007.”

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 209 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).